Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 144C.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 144C.8 Forfeiture of authority to control. A designee or person with the authority to control under this chapter shall forfeit all rights and authority under a declaration, or by operation of section 144C.5 , and all rights and authority under the declaration, or by operation of section 144C.5 , shall vest in and devolve upon an alternate designee, or if there is none, vest in and devolve pursuant to section 144C.5 , under either any of the following circumstances: 1. The designee or person with the authority to control under this chapter is charged with murder in the first or second degree or voluntary manslaughter in connection with the declarantâs decedentâs death and those charges are known to a third party. 2. The designee or person with the authority to control under this chapter does not exercise the designeeâs authority under the declaration or the personâs authority under this chapter within twenty-four hours of receiving notification of the death of the declarant decedent or within forty hours of the declarantâs decedentâs death, whichever is earlier. 3. The designee or person with the authority to control under this chapter does not claim the cremated remains of the House File 2349, p. 2 decedent within thirty calendar days after receipt of a written notice from a third party. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2349, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor